test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vegur
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: veg
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [veg, vegi]
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: vegar
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: vegir
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: vegir
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: vegum
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: vega
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: vegurin
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: vegin
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [vegnum, veginum]
    vegur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: vegarins
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: vegirnir
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: vegirnar
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: vegunum
    vegur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: veganna
